Vermont, session 2025-2026, H711.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 32 V.S.A. § 9706 is amended to read:
§ 9706. STATUTORY PURPOSE
* * *
(pp) The statutory purpose of the exemption for precious metal bullion and
coins in subdivision 9741(57) of this title is to promote investment in gold and
silver.
VT LEG #384985 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.711
2026 Page 2 of 2
Sec. 2. 32 V.S.A. § 9741 is amended to read:
§ 9741. SALES NOT COVERED
Retail sales and use of the following shall be exempt from the tax on retail
sales imposed under section 9771 of this title and the use tax imposed under
section 9773 of this title:
* * *
(57) Precious metal bullion or coins.
(A) As used in this subdivision (57), “precious metal bullion or
coins” means personal property made of gold or silver that has undergone a
refining process and is in a state or condition in which the personal property’s
value is primarily determined by precious metal content. “Precious metal
bullion or coins” includes monetized bullion, coins, and other forms of money
manufactured from gold or silver and that have been used as a medium of
exchange under the laws of Vermont, the United States, or a foreign nation.
(B) As used in this subdivision (57), “precious metal bullion or
coins” does not mean jewelry, a work of art made from precious metal bullion
or coins, or precious metals that have been processed or manufactured for
industrial, professional, or artistic use.
Sec. 3. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
VT LEG #384985 v.1